Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1707
Survey; plat; field notes; filing.

A correct plat of the road, together with the field notes of the surveyor, shall be filed in the office of the county surveyor. Where no regular office is maintained in the county courthouse for the county surveyor such plat and field notes shall be filed with the county clerk.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 7, p. 543.